src/morphology/stems/adverbs.lexc
LEXICON AV_GATEWAY
AV ; 
AV_TEMPORAL ; 
AV_DAB_ADDITIONS ;

LEXICON AV_DAB_ADDITIONS
gbey'iinh:gabeyVi1hiinh    AV_TAG    " for a long time" ; ! this could just be the result of a transcription error, cf: gbey'iing:gabeyVi1hiing    AV_TAG    " 1 for a long time" ; !Rand key:n73017937637n
aabdig:aabidig    AV_TAG    " 1 certainly, for sure, of course;  2 have to (do something)" ; !This is the Rhodes form for: aabdek:aabidek    AV_TAG    " 1 certainly, for sure, of course;  2 have to (do something)" ; !Rand key:n7291537870n
wiin:wiin       AV_TAG  "contrastive" ; !
aabtaa-dbik:aabitaadibik AV_TAG "1 midnight, the evening up to midnight (as a unit)" ; !Rand key:n201132516-55-39n DAB this is classed as ni-time by Rand, but av makes more sense (also follows Rhodes)
wenjda:wenjida  AV_TAG "1 on purpose, intentionally, as intended" ;
washme:ooshime          AV_TAG " 1 more [than another], more [than at another time];  2 more than [some point of reference], beyond [some point of reference]" ; !reduced variant of washme

LEXICON AV_TEMPORAL
bboon:biboon    AV_TAG    " 1 winter" ; ! SHORTENED VERSION OF gbe-bboon Rand key:n73017936268n
dbik:dibik    AV_TAG    " 1 night" ; ! SHORTENED VERSION OF gbe-dbik Rand key:n73017936343n
giizhik:giizhig    AV_TAG    " 1 day" ; ! SHORTENED VERSION OF gbe-giizhik Rand key:n73017936376n
naagosh:onaagosh    AV_TAG    " 1 evening" ; ! SHORTENED VERSION OF gbe-naagosh Rand key:n73017937220n
niibin:niibin    AV_TAG    " 1 summer" ; ! SHORTENED VERSION OF endso-niibin Rand key:n73017936290n
shkwaa-naawkwe:ishkwaa-naawakwe    AV_TAG    " 1 afternoon" ; ! SHORTENED VERSION OF gbe-shkwaa-naawkwe Rand key:n73017937172n
zhebaa:zhebaa    AV_TAG    " 1 the past morning" ; ! SHORTENED VERSION OF gbe-zhebaa Rand key:n73017937356n
ggizhep:gigizheb    AV_TAG    " in the morning" ; ! SHORTENED VERSION OF gchi-ggizhep Rand key:n73019343171n

LEXICON AV_TAG
+Adv:0  CLOSED_PROTECTION ; 

LEXICON AV
aabiish:aabiish    AV_TAG    " 1 where, which (interrogative, used to ask questions of where or which)" ; !Rand key:n72971644044n
aabtawyi'iing:aabitawyihiing    AV_TAG    " 1 halfway" ; !Rand key:n7297245381n
aana:aana    AV_TAG    " 1 fortunately, thankfully (CL);  2 in vain, to no avail (CL)" ; !Rand key:n72973262886n
aanii:aanii    AV_TAG    " 1 how, in what way, what" ; !Rand key:n7297244607n
aaniish:aaniish    AV_TAG    " 1 How are things going [with you]?" ; !Rand key:n72973360818n
aanwi:aanawi    AV_TAG    " 1 fortunately, thankfully;  2 could, may be so, maybe so (an expression of pessimism);  3 manage;  4 doggedly, persistently;  5 anyhow, at any rate;  6 to be sure, it must be acknowledged" ; !Rand key:n72972748759n
aapin:aapin    AV_TAG    " 1 like, the same" ; !Rand key:n72973751577n
aasmagmik:aasamagamig    AV_TAG    " 1 against [the wall of] a building" ; !Rand key:n72973859684n
aazhoogaam:aazhoogaam    AV_TAG    " 1 across [a body of water]" ; !Rand key:n72974451830n
aazhwaakwaa:aazhwaakwaa    AV_TAG    " 1 the other side of the woods; on the other side of the woods" ; !Rand key:n72974452617n
baabge:baabige    AV_TAG    " 1 quickly, right away" ; !Rand key:n72915856369n
baapish:baapish    AV_TAG    " 1 any moment (now), momentarily, soon" ; !Rand key:n72975249239n
bebezhik:bebezhig    AV_TAG    " 1 one by one, one at a time" ; !Rand key:n72976544009n
begish:begish    AV_TAG    " 1 hope, wish" ; !Rand key:n72976545219n
besha:beshVa1    AV_TAG    " 1 close, nearby, near (in space or in time)" ; !Rand key:n72976555859n
bgodkana:bagodikana    AV_TAG    " 1 on a road out in the wilds" ; !Rand key:n72976841385n ![gk]Vo1 replaced with [gk]o
biindik:biindig    AV_TAG    " 1 inside [a building]" ; !Rand key:n72977381125n
biitwi'iing:biitwihiing    AV_TAG    " 1 in the middle [between layers], in between [two layers]" ; !Rand key:n72977484399n
bjiinak:bijiinag    AV_TAG    " 1 just [a short time ago, or a short time in the future];  2 as soon as;  3 only now, only then" ; !Rand key:n72977548957n
bmena:bVv1mena    AV_TAG    " 1 less, diminished in intensity" ; !Rand key:n72977959008n
bwaatmaach:bwaatamaach    AV_TAG    " 1 gradually" ; !Rand key:n72985132436n
dash:dash    AV_TAG    " 1 and so, and then, so, then, so then;  2 how about, what about" ; !Rand key:n72989352536n
dbishkoo:dibishkoo    AV_TAG    " 1 as, like" ; !Rand key:n72994041485n
dibaakiing:dibaakiing    AV_TAG    " 1 in the woods" ; !Rand key:n73004850862n
edwidetek:edVv1widetek    AV_TAG    " 1 on both sides of the forehead" ; !Rand key:n73102053379n
en'gok:enigok    AV_TAG    " 1 with all one's might" ; !Rand key:n73015875869n
eshkam:eshkam    AV_TAG    " 1 increasingly, more and more " ; !Rand key:n73015783005n
eta:eta    AV_TAG    " 1 just, only" ; !Rand key:n73015763262n
ezhi-gchi-nikaayin:ezhi-gichi-nikaayin    AV_TAG    " 1 at your right side" ; !Rand key:n73015879127n
gaagnik:gaaginig    AV_TAG    " 1 forever; very often" ; !Rand key:n73016049026n
gaamkana:agaamikana    AV_TAG    " 1 across the road, on the other side of the road" ; !Rand key:n73016050024n
gaawaanh:agaawaanh    AV_TAG    " 1 barely, hardly, scarcely" ; !Rand key:n73017374047n
ge:ge    AV_TAG    " 1 and, also, as well" ; !Rand key:n73019735726n
geshtine:gezhidine    AV_TAG    " 1 now [while there's an opportunity], while one is at it" ; !Rand key:n73020047296n !DAB OPD has gezhidine
ggwaansagkamik:gagwaanisagakamig    AV_TAG    " 1 [see ggwaansagaadkamik]" ; !Rand key:n73020960220n
gidaatik:Va1gidaatig    AV_TAG    " 1 on the log, on the [wooden] rail" ; !Rand key:n73021377858n
giiwednong:giiwedinong    AV_TAG    " 1 from the north, in the north, to the north" ; !Rand key:n73023777780n
gijiyiinh:Va1gijiyiinh    AV_TAG    " 1 see gijiyiing" ; !Rand key:n73024359282n
gojiing:agojiing    AV_TAG    " 1 outdoors, outside" ; !Rand key:n73030324497n ![gk]Vo1 replaced with [gk]o
iidok:iidog    AV_TAG    " 1 supposedly; probably, perhaps; I guess" ; !Rand key:n73028042613n
jiigbiing:jiigibiing    AV_TAG    " 1 [at the] waterfront" ; !Rand key:n7307766636n
jiinaago:jiinaago    AV_TAG    " 1 yesterday" ; !Rand key:n73028439640n
maampii:maamapii    AV_TAG    " 1 here;  2 this...here" ; !Rand key:n71429152082n
megwaa:megwaa    AV_TAG    " 1 at the moment, at the same time, at this moment, at this time, currently, now, right now, in the midst of;  2 while, when (over a period of time), as..." ; !Rand key:n71429559918n
memdage:memindage    AV_TAG    " 1 particularly, to an extreme degree, to an unusual extent or degree;  2 especially (singling out someone or something in particular)" ; !Rand key:n71429561576n
mii'sh:mii-sh    AV_TAG    " 1 and so, and that's..., and then" ; !Rand key:n71429682069n
msawaa:misawaa    AV_TAG    " 1 even; although" ; !Rand key:n73033247695n
mzhisha:mizhisha    AV_TAG    " 1 in full view" ; !Rand key:n73098281706n
naamaabik:anaamaabik    AV_TAG    " 1 under the rock" ; !Rand key:n71431051860n
naamyi'iing:anaamayihiing    AV_TAG    " 1 [see naamyi'ii]" ; !Rand key:n71431052716n
naanaawgwiyiing:naanaawigwiyiing    AV_TAG    " 1 in the middle" ; !Rand key:n73033414994n
naanimye:naanimaye    AV_TAG    " 1 a little while ago, a short time ago" ; !Rand key:n73033415380n
naawyi'iing:naawVi1yihiing    AV_TAG    " 1 [see naawyi'ii]" ; !Rand key:n73098534933n
ndaashti:Vv1ndaashVv1ti    AV_TAG    " 1 on this side" ; !Rand key:n73033632017n
neyaap:neyaab    AV_TAG    " 1 back, return to earlier state or location" ; !Rand key:n71431562755n
ngodbaabaan:ningodibahaabaan    AV_TAG    " 1 [see ngodba'aabaan]" ; !Rand key:n73099855867n
ngodooshkin:ningodooshkin    AV_TAG    " 1 one bagful" ; !Rand key:n71431649277n
ni-ngo-giisagak:ani-ningo-giizisagak    AV_TAG    " 1 in one month's time" ; !Rand key:n73098749965n
niisaajwan:niisaajiwan    AV_TAG    " 1 downriver, downstream" ; !Rand key:n71431766298n
nikey'iing:inikeyVv1hiing    AV_TAG    " 1 in a certain direction, in a certain way, in a certain place" ; !Rand key:n71431866776n
nnaasa:nanaasa    AV_TAG    " 1 from time to time, periodically" ; !Rand key:n73033817650n
noondaash:noondaash    AV_TAG    " 1 less than, under" ; !Rand key:n73033840430n
ntam:nitam    AV_TAG    " 1 first;  2 [someone's] turn" ; !Rand key:n71435060710n
pii:apii    AV_TAG    " 1 at a certain time, when" ; !Rand key:n73031182181n
shaweyiing:ashaweyiing    AV_TAG    " 1 alongside [of something], beside, on the side [of something]" ; !Rand key:n73031382986n
shpimsagoong:Vi1shpimisagoong    AV_TAG    " 1 upstairs" ; !Rand key:n73031513257n
waawiikaa:waawiikaa    AV_TAG    " 1 infrequently, sporadically" ; !Rand key:n73037254506n
wenbik:wenibik    AV_TAG    " 1 for a little while, for a few moments" ; !Rand key:n73071884268n
wiikaa:wiikaa    AV_TAG    " 1 ever;  2 late, after some appropriate time;  3 after a time, after a long time;  4 rarely, only rarely;  5 never (with a negative adverb such as gaa or gaawii" ; !Rand key:n730720991n
yeyiidwagaat:ayeyiidawagaad    AV_TAG    " 1 on both legs" ; !Rand key:n73072242268n
zhaazhi:zhaazhi    AV_TAG    " 1 already, by now, by this time;  2 quite a while ago, long ago" ; !Rand key:n73072639512n
zhiw:zhiw    AV_TAG    " 1 there" ; !Rand key:n73072870871n
waawaasa:waawaasa    AV_TAG    " 1 far, a great distance" ; !Rand key:n65303517919n
mno-nish:mino-onizhish    AV_TAG    " 1 good thing" ; !Rand key:n2010121220-23-48n
babiijin:ababiijin    AV_TAG    " 1 always" ; !Rand key:n20113269-0-33n
endso-niibing:endaso-niibing    AV_TAG    " 1 every summer, each summer" ; !Rand key:n201132920-17-45n
giizhaa:giizhaa    AV_TAG    " 1 already, beforehand" ; !Rand key:n201133118-25-51n
jiigaajwan:jiigaajiwan    AV_TAG    " 1 by a stream or river, near a stream or river" ; !Rand key:n20114311-21-44n
megyaakwaa:megwayaakwaa    AV_TAG    " 1 in the woods, in the bush" ; !Rand key:n20114919-8-20n
dbigiishk:dVv1bigiishk    AV_TAG    " 1 abruptly cut off (e.g. fall silent), [sound] end abruptly" ; !Rand key:n20161237-28-58n
